Washington statutes.
RCW 18.17.050

Active duty military personnel or their spouses.

Active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate a home state where the individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home state designation during the period the service member is on active duty. Subsequent to designating a home state, the individual shall only change their home state through application for licensure in the new state, or through the process outlined in RCW 18.17.040.

[ 2023 c 58 s 6.]